Hawaii statutes.
[§279D-11] Annual reports. A
metropolitan planning organization shall submit an annual report to the
legislature of all activities conducted by the organization during the year
immediately preceding the submission of the report. The annual report shall be
submitted to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening
of each regular session beginning with the regular session of 2016. [L 2015, c
132, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next